Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-816
Pre-process; required; when; procedure.

Each proposed contract for services in excess of fifty thousand dollars which requests services that are now performed or have, within the year immediately preceding the date of the proposed contract, been performed by a state employee covered by the classified personnel system or by any labor contract shall use a pre-process prescribed by the division. The pre-process shall include evaluation of the displacement of the employee of the state agency or position held by the employee of the state agency within the preceding year and of the disadvantages of such a contract for services against the expected advantages, whether economic or otherwise. Documentation of each evaluation shall be maintained in the contract file by the state agency.

Laws 2003, LB 626, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 73-509;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 16.